Hawaii statutes.
TITLE 38.
PROCEDURAL AND

SUPPLEMENTARY
PROVISIONS

Note

Codification. Act 9, Session Laws 1972, repealed or
recodified this title in its entirety, substituting the present Title 38,
entitled (by the revisor of statutes) "Procedural and Supplementary Provisions",
for former Title 38, entitled "Crimes". For the disposition of
former Title 38, see disposition table in Appendix, this title.

Renumbering. This title as presently constituted
consists in the main of provisions transferred from former Title 37,
"Criminal Law". Upon initial transfer in 1973, the provisions were
assigned new numbers under this title. The provisions were again renumbered
and assigned the present numbers in the 1975 Supplement. See tracing table in
Appendix, this title.

As to procedural statutes superseded by the rules of court,
see note preceding Title 32.

Chapter

801 Rights of Accused

801D Rights of Victims and Witnesses in Criminal
Proceedings

802 Counsel and Other Services for Indigent
Criminal

Defendants

802E Court Advisement of Aliens Entering Guilty
Plea

803 Arrests, Search Warrants

804 Bail; Bond to Keep the Peace

805 Criminal Procedure: District Courts

806 Criminal Procedure: Circuit Courts

806D Criminal Process Records

807 to 830 Reserved

831 Uniform Act on Status of Convicted Persons

832 Uniform Criminal Extradition Act

833 Uniform Rendition of Accused Persons Act

834 Agreement on Detainers

835 Securing Attendance of Witness by Material
Witness Order

836 Uniform Act to Secure the Attendance of
Witnesses from

without a State in Criminal Proceedings

837 to 840 Reserved

841 Inquests, Coroners

842 Organized Crime

843 Hawaii Criminal Justice Commission--Repealed

844 State Law Enforcement Planning Agency--Repealed

844D Forensic Identification

845 Career Criminals

846 Hawaii Criminal Justice Data Center; Civil
Identification

846C National Crime Prevention and Privacy Compact

846D Juvenile Justice Information System

846E Registration of Sex Offenders and Other
Covered Offenders

and Public Access to Registration Information

846F Internet Crimes Against Children

847 to 850 Reserved

851 Credit Card Offenses--Repealed

852 Obstruction of Ingress or Egress

853 Criminal Procedure: Deferred Acceptance of
Guilty Plea,

Nolo Contendere Plea

APPENDIX

1. Table of Disposition--Title 38. Crimes

2. Tracing Table--Title 38 (New)

CHAPTER
801

RIGHTS OF
ACCUSED

Section

801-1 Indictment or information

801-2 Witnesses; defense

801-3 Jury list, witnesses

801-4 Fees not payable by defendant

801-5 Repealed

Note

As to procedural statutes superseded by the rules of court,
see note preceding Title 32.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next